Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1717
Isolated land; location of access road.

Whenever possible, an access road provided in accordance with section 39-1716 shall be along section lines. When the most practicable route for the access road is adjacent to a watercourse, the land to be taken for the access road shall be measured from the edge of the watercourse.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. IV, § 17, p. 546;

Laws 1982, LB 239, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 8.